Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 11

Merger and Conversion

61-3-1101. Definitions.

As used in this part:

“Articles of conversion” means articles under § 61-3-1114;

“Articles of merger” means articles under § 61-3-1108;

“Conversion” means a transaction authorized by §§ 61-3-1110 – 61-3-1115;

“Converted entity” means the converting entity as the converting entity continues in existence after a conversion;

“Converting entity” means the domestic entity that approves a plan of conversion pursuant to § 61-3-1112 or the foreign entity that approves a conversion pursuant to the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

“Distributional interest” means the right under an unincorporated entity's organic law and organic rules to receive distributions from the entity;

“Domestic”, with respect to an entity, means governed as to the entity's internal affairs by the law of this state;

“Entity”:

Means:

A business corporation;

A nonprofit corporation;

A general partnership, including a limited liability partnership;

A limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership;

A limited liability company;

A general cooperative association;

A limited cooperative association;

An unincorporated nonprofit association;

A statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other person that has:

A legal existence separate from any interest holder of that person; or

The power to acquire an interest in real property in its own name; and

Does not include:

An individual;

A trust with a predominantly donative purpose or a charitable trust;

An association or relationship that is not an entity listed in subdivision (6)(A) and is not a partnership under § 61-1-202 or a similar provision of the governing jurisdiction;

A decedent's estate; or

A government or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;

“Filing entity”:

Means an entity whose formation requires the filing of a public organic record; and

Does not include a limited liability partnership;

“Foreign,” with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to the entity's internal affairs by the law of a jurisdiction other than this state;

“Governance interest” means a right under the organic law or organic rules of an unincorporated entity, other than as a governor, agent, assignee, or proxy, to:

Receive or demand access to information concerning, or the books and records of, the entity;

Vote for or consent to the election of the governors of the entity; or

Receive notice of or vote on or consent to an issue involving the internal affairs of the entity;

“Governor” means:

A director of a business corporation;

A director or trustee of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A manager of a manager-managed limited liability company;

A member of a member-managed limited liability company;

A director of a general cooperative association;

A director of a limited cooperative association;

A manager of an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A trustee of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other person under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised and under whose direction the entity's activities and affairs are managed pursuant to the organic law and organic rules of the entity;

“Interest” means:

A share in a business corporation;

A membership in a nonprofit corporation;

A partnership interest in a general partnership;

A partnership interest in a limited partnership;

A membership interest in a limited liability company;

A share in a general cooperative association;

A member's interest in a limited cooperative association;

A membership in an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

A governance interest or distributional interest in any other type of unincorporated entity;

“Interest holder” means:

A shareholder of a business corporation;

A member of a nonprofit corporation;

A general partner of a general partnership;

A general partner of a limited partnership;

A limited partner of a limited partnership;

A member of a limited liability company;

A shareholder of a general cooperative association;

A member of a limited cooperative association;

A member of an unincorporated nonprofit association;

A beneficiary or beneficial owner of a statutory trust, business trust, or common-law business trust; or

Any other direct holder of an interest;

“Interest holder liability” means:

Personal liability for a liability of an entity that is imposed on a person:

Solely by reason of the status of the person as an interest holder; or

By the organic rules of the entity that make one (1) or more specified interest holders or categories of interest holders liable in their capacity as interest holders for all or specified liabilities of the entity; or

An obligation of an interest holder under the organic rules of an entity to contribute to the entity;

“Merger” means a transaction authorized by §§ 61-3-1104 – 61-3-1109;

“Merging entity” means an entity that is a party to a merger and exists immediately before the merger becomes effective;

“Organic law” means the law of an entity's jurisdiction of formation governing the internal affairs of the entity;

“Organic rules” means the public organic record and private organic rules of an entity;

“Plan” means a plan of merger, plan of conversion, or plan of domestication;

“Plan of conversion” means a plan under § 61-3-1111;

“Plan of merger” means a plan under § 61-3-1105;

“Private organic rules”:

Means the rules, whether or not in a record, that govern the internal affairs of an entity, are binding on all its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic record, if any; and

Includes:

The bylaws of a business corporation;

The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation;

The partnership agreement of a general partnership;

The partnership agreement of a limited partnership;

The operating agreement of a limited liability company;

The bylaws of a general cooperative association;

The bylaws of a limited cooperative association;

The governing principles of an unincorporated nonprofit association; and

The trust instrument of a statutory trust or similar rules of a business trust or a common-law business trust;

“Protected agreement” means:

A record evidencing indebtedness and any related agreement in effect on the date the entity becomes subject to this chapter pursuant to § 61-3-1207;

An agreement that is binding on an entity on the date the entity becomes subject to this chapter pursuant to § 61-3-1207;

The organic rules of an entity in effect on the date the entity becomes subject to this chapter pursuant to § 61-3-1207; or

An agreement that is binding on any of the governors or interest holders of an entity on the date the entity becomes subject to this chapter pursuant to § 61-3-1207;

“Public organic record”:

Means the record the filing of which by the secretary of state is required to form an entity and any amendment to or restatement of that record; and

Includes:

The articles of incorporation of a business corporation;

The articles of incorporation of a nonprofit corporation;

The certificate of limited partnership of a limited partnership;

The articles of organization of a limited liability company;

The articles of incorporation of a general cooperative association;

The articles of organization of a limited cooperative association; and

The certificate of trust of a statutory trust or similar record of a business trust;

“Registered foreign entity” means a foreign entity that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a record filed by the secretary of state;

“Surviving entity” means the entity that continues in existence after or is created by a merger; and

“Type of entity” means a generic form of entity:

Recognized at common law; or

Formed under an organic law, whether or not some entities formed under that organic law are subject to provisions of that law that create different categories of the form of entity.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 23, 24.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (a), substituted “articles of organization” for “certificate of organization” in (B)(iv) of the definition of “public organic record”; substituted the definition of “articles of conversion” for the definition of “statement of conversion”; and substituted the definition of “articles of merger” for the definition of “statement of merger”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1102. Required notice or approval.

A domestic entity that is required to give notice to, or obtain the approval of, a governmental agency or officer of this state to be a party to a merger shall give the notice or obtain the approval to be a party to a conversion.

Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state by a domestic or foreign entity immediately before a transaction under this part becomes effective must not, as a result of the transaction, be diverted from the objects for which the property was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred unless, to the extent required by or pursuant to the law of this state concerning cy pres or other law dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets, the entity obtains an appropriate order of the attorney general specifying the disposition of the property.

A bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance that is made to a merging entity that is not the surviving entity and that takes effect or remains payable after the merger inures to the surviving entity.

A trust obligation that would govern property if transferred to a nonsurviving entity applies to property that is transferred to the surviving entity under this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1103. Appraisal rights.

An interest holder of a domestic merging or converting limited partnership is entitled to contractual appraisal rights in connection with a transaction under this part only to the extent provided in:

The partnership agreement; or

The plan.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1104. Merger Authorized.

By complying with §§ 61-3-1105 – 61-3-1109:

One (1) or more domestic limited partnerships may merge with one (1) or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

Two (2) or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic limited partnership.

By complying with §§ 61-3-1104 – 61-3-1109 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under §§ 61-3-1105 – 61-3-1109 or may be the surviving entity in the merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1105. Plan of merger.

A domestic limited partnership may become a party to a merger under this section and §§ 61-3-1106 – 61-3-1109 by approving a plan of merger. The plan must be in a record and contain:

As to each merging entity, its name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger, a statement to that effect and the entity's name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

The manner of converting the interests in each party to the merger into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger, any proposed amendments to:

Its public organic record, if any; and

Its private organic rules that are, or are proposed to be, in a record;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger:

Its proposed public organic record, if any; and

The full text of its private organic rules that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the merger; and

Any other provision required by the law of a merging entity's jurisdiction of formation or the organic rules of a merging entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a plan of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1106. Approval of merger.

A plan of merger is not effective unless the plan has been approved:

By a domestic merging limited partnership, the affirmative vote or consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective; and

In a record, by each partner of a domestic merging limited partnership that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of a merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A merger involving a domestic merging entity that is not a limited partnership is not effective unless the merger is approved by that entity in accordance with the entity's organic law.

A merger involving a foreign merging entity is not effective unless the merger is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1107. Amendment or abandonment of plan of merger.

A plan of merger may be amended only with the consent of each party to the plan, except as otherwise provided in the plan.

A domestic merging limited partnership may approve an amendment of a plan of merger:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which the plan may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the merger is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by the interest holders of any party to the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the surviving entity that will be in effect immediately after the merger becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the surviving entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of merger has been approved and before the articles of merger becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic merging limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of merger is abandoned after articles of merger have been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the articles become effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by a party to the plan, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the articles of merger become effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the merger is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of each party to the plan of merger;

The date on which the articles of merger were filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the merger has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 25, 26.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “articles of merger” for “statement of merger” throughout (c) and (d); and made related changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1108. Articles of merger — Effective date of merger.

Articles of merger must be signed by each merging entity and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of merger must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of each merging entity that is not the surviving entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the surviving entity;

A statement that the merger was approved by each domestic merging entity, if any, in accordance with §§ 61-3-1104 – 61-3-1109 and by each foreign merging entity, if any, in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger and is a domestic filing entity, any amendment to its public organic record approved as part of the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment; and

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic limited liability partnership, its application for registration, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b), articles of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the surviving entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

If the surviving entity is a domestic limited partnership, the merger becomes effective when the articles of merger are effective. In all cases, the merger becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the surviving entity; or

When the articles are effective.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 27, 28.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “Articles of merger” for “A statement of merger” at the beginning of (a) and the introductory language of (b); substituted “articles of merger” for “a statement of merger” in (c); in the introductory paragraph of (e), substituted “the articles of merger are effective” for “the statement of merger is effective” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “In all cases,” for “In all other cases,” at the beginning of the second sentence; substituted “or” for “and” at the end of (e)(1); and substituted “articles are effective” for “the statement is effective” at the end of (e)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1109. Effect of merger.

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving entity continues or comes into existence;

Each merging entity that is not the surviving entity ceases to exist;

All property of each merging entity vests in the surviving entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of each merging entity are debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the surviving entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of merger, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each merging entity vest in the surviving entity;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

All of the surviving entity's property continues to be vested in it without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

The surviving entity remains subject to all of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities; and

All the surviving entity's rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes continue to be vested in it;

The name of the surviving entity may be substituted for the name of any merging entity that is a party to any pending action or proceeding;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

The surviving entity's public organic record, if any, is amended to the extent provided in the statement of merger; and

The surviving entity's private organic rules that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger, its private organic rules become effective and:

If the surviving entity is a filing entity, its public organic record becomes effective; and

If the surviving entity is a limited liability partnership, its application for registration becomes effective; and

The interests in each merging entity that are to be converted in the merger are converted, and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of merger and to any appraisal rights they have under § 61-3-1103 and the merging entity's organic law.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a merging entity, the merger does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the merging entity.

When a merger becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to any of the merging entities and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the merger has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of that entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective.

When a merger becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic merging limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following:

The merger does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the merger became effective;

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the merger becomes effective;

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subdivision (d)(1) as if the merger had not occurred; and

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic merging limited partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subdivision (d)(1) as if the merger had not occurred.

When a merger becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the surviving entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a domestic merging limited partnership as provided in § 61-3-119.

When a merger becomes effective, the registration to do business in this state of any foreign merging entity that is not the surviving entity is cancelled.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1110. Conversion authorized.

By complying with §§ 61-3-1111 – 61-3-1115, a domestic limited partnership may become:

A domestic entity that is a different type of entity; or

A foreign entity that is a different type of entity, if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

By complying with the provisions of §§ 61-3-1111 – 61-3-1115 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may become a domestic limited partnership if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to a conversion, the provision applies to a conversion of the partnership as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after the date the entity becomes subject to this chapter pursuant to § 61-3-1207.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1111. Plan of conversion.

A domestic limited partnership may convert to a different type of entity under this section and §§ 61-3-1112 – 61-3-1115 by approving a plan of conversion. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name of the converting limited partnership;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

The manner of converting the interests in the converting limited partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed public organic record of the converted entity if it will be a filing entity;

The private organic rules of the converted entity that are proposed to be in a record when the conversion is effective;

Any other terms and conditions of the conversion not otherwise set forth in the private organic rules of the converting limited partnership or the law of this state; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the converting limited partnership.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a plan of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1112. Approval of conversion.

A plan of conversion is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic converting limited partnership, the affirmative vote or consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective; and

In a record, by each partner of a domestic converting limited partnership that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the conversion becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of a conversion or a merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all of the partners; and

The partner voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A conversion involving a domestic converting entity that is not a limited partnership is not effective unless it is approved by the domestic converting entity in accordance with its organic law.

A conversion of a foreign converting entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1113. Amendment or abandonment of plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion of a domestic converting limited partnership may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the conversion is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the partners of the converting partnership under the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the converted entity that will be in effect immediately after the conversion becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the converted entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by a domestic converting limited partnership and before articles of conversion become effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic converting limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

lf a plan of conversion is abandoned after articles of conversion have been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the articles become effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the converting entity, shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the articles of conversion become effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the conversion is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the converting limited partnership;

The date on which the articles of conversion were filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 29, 30.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “articles of conversion” for “a statement of conversion” throughout (b) and (c) and made related changes; and substituted “shall be delivered” for “must be delivered” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1114. Articles of conversion — Effective date of conversion.

Articles of conversion must be signed by the converting entity and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of conversion must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

If the converting entity is a domestic limited partnership, a statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with §§ 61-3-1112 – 61-3-1115 or, if the converting entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the conversion was approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the converted entity is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment; and

If the converted entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, its application for registration, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b), articles of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the converted entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

If the converted entity is a domestic limited partnership, the conversion becomes effective when articles of conversion are effective. In all other cases, the conversion becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the converted entity; and

When the articles are effective.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 31-33.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “Articles of conversion” for “A statement of conversion” at the beginning of (a) and the introductory language of (b); substituted “articles of conversion” for “a statement of conversion” in (c); substituted “articles of conversion are effective” for “the statement of conversion is effective” at the end of the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (e); and substituted “the articles are effective” for “the statement is effective” in (e)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1115. Effect of conversion.

When a conversion becomes effective:

The converted entity is:

Organized under and subject to the organic law of the converted entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the converting entity;

All property of the converting entity continues to be vested in the converted entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converting entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converted entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of conversion, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity remain in the converted entity;

The name of the converted entity may be substituted for the name of the converting entity in any pending action or proceeding;

The certificate of limited partnership of the converted entity becomes effective;

The provisions of the partnership agreement of the converted entity that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of conversion become effective; and

The interests in the converting entity are converted, and the interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of conversion and to any appraisal rights they have under § 61-3-1103.

Except as otherwise provided in the partnership agreement of a domestic converting limited partnership, the conversion does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the converting entity.

When a conversion becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the converting entity and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the conversion has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the conversion becomes effective.

When a conversion becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic converting limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following:

The conversion does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the conversion became effective;

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the conversion becomes effective;

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subdivision (d)(1) as if the conversion had not occurred; and

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter or the organic rules of the converting entity with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subdivision (d)(1) as if the conversion had not occurred.

When a conversion becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the converted entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities as provided in § 61-3-119.

If the converting entity is a registered foreign entity, its registration to do business in this state is cancelled when the conversion becomes effective.

A conversion does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.